Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2601
Act, how cited.

Sections 54-2601 to 54-2631 shall be known and may be cited as the Competitive Livestock Markets Act.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 856, § 25.